indomorph/hin/pron.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Pron
+Prs +Rel
+1st +2nd +3rd
+Sg +Pl
+Fam +Hon
+Dir +Obl +Dat +Gen +Abl +Loc +Erg +Corr

LEXICON Root
! Direct case pronouns
मैं+Pron+Prs+1st+Sg+Dir:मैं # ;
हम+Pron+Prs+1st+Pl+Dir:हम # ;
तू+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fam+Dir:तू # ;
तुम+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Fam+Dir:तुम # ;
आप+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Hon+Dir:आप # ;
आप+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Hon+Dir:आप # ;
यह+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Prox+Dir:यह # ;
य+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Prox+Dir:ये # ;
वह+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Dist+Dir:वह # ;
वे+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Dist+Dir:वे # ;

! Pronouns in dative case
मुझे+Pron+Prs+1st+Sg+Dat:मुझे # ;
मुझको+Pron+Prs+1st+Sg+Dat:मुझको # ;
तुझे+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fam+Dat:तुझे # ;
तुझको+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fam+Dat:तुझको # ;
तुम्हें+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Fam+Dat:तुम्हें # ;
तुमको+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Fam+Dat:तुमको # ;
आपको+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Hon+Dat:आपको # ;
आपको+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Hon+Dat:आपको # ;
इसे+Pron+Prs+3nd+Sg+Prox+Dat:इसे # ;
इसको+Pron+Prs+3nd+Sg+Prox+Dat:इसको # ;
इन्हें+Pron+Prs+3nd+Pl+Prox+Dat:इन्हें # ;
इनको+Pron+Prs+3nd+Pl+Prox+Dat:इनको # ;
उसे+Pron+Prs+3nd+Sg+Dist+Dat:उसे # ;
उसको+Pron+Prs+3nd+Sg+Dist+Dat:उसको # ;
उन्हें+Pron+Prs+3nd+Pl+Dist+Dat:उन्हें # ;
उनको+Pron+Prs+3nd+Pl+Dist+Dat:उनको # ;

! Pronouns in genitive case
मेरा+Pron+Prs+1sg+Sg+Masc+Gen:मेरा # ;
मेरी+Pron+Prs+1sg+Sg+Fem+Gen:मेरी # ;
हमार+Pron+Prs+1sg+Pl+Masc+Gen:हमारा # ;
हमारी+Pron+Prs+1sg+Pl+Fem+Gen:हमारी # ;
तेरा+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Masc+Fam+Gen:तेरा # ;
तेरी+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fem+Fam+Gen:तेरी # ;
तुम्हारा+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Masc+Fam+Gen:तुम्हारा # ;
तुम्हारी+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Fem+Fam+Gen:तुम्हारी # ;
आपका+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Masc+Hon+Gen:आपका # ;
आपकी+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fem+Hon+Gen:आपकी # ;
आपका+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Masc+Hon+Gen:आपका # ;
आपकी+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Fem+Hon+Gen:आपकी # ;
इसका+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Masc+Prox+Gen:इसका # ;
इसकी+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Fem+Prox+Gen:इसकी # ;
इनका+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Masc+Prox+Gen:इनका # ;
इनकी+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Fem+Prox+Gen:इनकी # ;
उसका+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Masc+Dist+Gen:उसका # ;
उसकी+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Fem+Dist+Gen:उसकी # ;
उनका+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Masc+Dist+Gen:उनका # ;
उनकी+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Fem+Dist+Gen:उनकी # ;

! Pronouns in ablative case
मुझसे+Pron+Prs+1st+Sg+Abl:मुझसे # ;
हमसे+Pron+Prs+1st+Pl+Abl:हमसे # ;
तुझसे+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fam+Abl:तुझसे # ;
तुमसे+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fam+Abl:तुमसे # ;
तुमसे+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Fam+Abl:तुमसे # ;
आपसे+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Hon+Abl:आपसे # ;
आपसे+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Hon+Abl:आपसे # ;
इससे+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Prox+Abl:इससे # ;
इनसे+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Prox+Abl:इनसे # ;
उससे+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Dist+Abl:उससे # ;
उनसे+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Dist+Abl:उनसे # ;

! Pronouns in the locative case
मुझपर+Pron+Prs+1st+Sg+Loc:मुझपर # ;
हमपर+Pron+Prs+1st+Pl+Loc:हमपर # ;
तुझपर+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fam+Loc:तुझपर # ;
तुमपर+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Fam+Loc:तुमपर # ;
आपपर+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Hon+Loc:आपपर # ;
आपपर+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Hon+Loc:आपपर # ;
इसपर+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Prox+Loc:इसपर # ;
इनपर+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Prox+Loc:इनपर # ;
उसपर+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Dist+Loc:उसपर # ;
उनपर+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Dist+Loc:उनपर # ;

! Pronouns in the ergative case
मैंन+Pron+Prs+1st+Sg+Erg:मैंने # ;
हमन+Pron+Prs+1st+Pl+Erg:हमने # ;
तुन+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Fam+Erg:तुने # ;
तुमन+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Fam+Erg:तुमने # ;
आपने+Pron+Prs+2nd+Sg+Hon+Erg:आपने # ;
आपने+Pron+Prs+2nd+Pl+Hon+Erg:आपने # ;
इसने+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Prox+Erg:इसने # ;
इन्होंने+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Prox+Erg:इन्होंने # ;
उसने+Pron+Prs+3rd+Sg+Dist+Erg:उसने # ;
उन्होंने+Pron+Prs+3rd+Pl+Dist+Erg:उन्होंने # ;

! Relative pronouns
जो+Pron+Rel+Sg+Dir:जो # ;
जो+Pron+Rel+Pl+Dir:जो # ;
जिस+Pron+Rel+Sg+Obl:जिस # ;
जिन+Pron+Rel+Pl+Obl:जिन # ;
जिसे+Pron+Rel+Sg+Dat:जिसे # ;
जिन्हे+Pron+Rel+Pl+Dat:जिन्हे # ;
जिसका+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen:जिसका # ;
जिनका+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen:जिनका # ;
जिसने+Pron+Rel+Sg+Erg:जिसने # ;
जिन्होंने+Pron+Rel+Pl+Erg:जिन्होंने # ;
वह+Pron+Rel+Sg+Corr:वह # ;
वे+Pron+Rel+Pl+Corr:वे # ;
